New York, session 2025-2026, A2306.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general construction law is amended by adding a new 2 section 40-a to read as follows: 3 § 40-a. Public notices and publications. 1. Subject to the provisions 4 of subdivision two of this section and notwithstanding any provision of 5 law to the contrary, in any case in which notice of any fact is required 6 by law to be published or advertised in a newspaper, in addition such 7 requirement shall be satisfied by publication of the notice in an online 8 news publication that: 9 a. provides general interest news on a daily basis to a defined 10 geographic location; and 11 b. has been continuously published for at least one year prior to the 12 date of publication of the notice. 13 2. Any publication made pursuant to the terms of this section shall be 14 subject to all requirements and stipulations of publication imposed by 15 law or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction with regard to the 16 notice with the exception of a requirement that the notice be published 17 in a newspaper. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01158-01-5